Illinois, session 104th, SB3549.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by changing Section 6.11 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/6.11)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-1, 104-27, 8104-68, 104-73, 104-289, 104-324, and 104-379)9    Sec. 6.11. Required health benefits; Illinois Insurance 10Code requirements. The program of health benefits shall 11provide the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 12covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 13Section 356t of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of 14health benefits shall provide the coverage required under 15Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 16356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 17356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 18356z.17, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 19356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 20356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 21356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 22356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.76, and 356z.77, and 356z.81, and 23356z.88 356z.80 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of   SB3549- 2 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1health benefits must comply with Sections 155.22a, 155.37, 2355b, 356z.19, 370c, and 370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the 3Illinois Insurance Code. The program of health benefits shall 4provide the coverage required under Section 356m of the 5Illinois Insurance Code and, for the employees of the State 6Employee Group Insurance Program only, the coverage as also 7provided in Section 6.11B of this Act. The Department of 8Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this Section with 9respect to Sections 370c and 370c.1 of the Illinois Insurance 10Code; all other requirements of this Section shall be enforced 11by the Department of Central Management Services.12    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 13any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 14with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 15Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 16Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 17whatever reason, is unauthorized. 18(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 19eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 20103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 217-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-870, 22eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 23103-951, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-42, eff. 248-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 10-1-25.) 25    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-27, 104-68,   SB3549- 3 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1104-73, 104-289, 104-324, and 104-379 but before amendment by 2P.A. 104-1)3    Sec. 6.11. Required health benefits; Illinois Insurance 4Code requirements. The program of health benefits shall 5provide the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 6covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 7Section 356t of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of 8health benefits shall provide the coverage required under 9Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 10356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 11356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 12356z.17, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 13356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 14356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 15356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 16356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.76, and 356z.77, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 17356z.82, 356z.83, 356z.84, 356z.85, and 356z.88 of the 18Illinois Insurance Code. The program of health benefits must 19comply with Sections 155.22a, 155.37, 355b, 356z.19, 370c, and 20370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 21program of health benefits shall provide the coverage required 22under Section 356m of the Illinois Insurance Code and, for the 23employees of the State Employee Group Insurance Program only, 24the coverage as also provided in Section 6.11B of this Act. The 25Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this 26Section with respect to Sections 370c and 370c.1 and Article   SB3549- 4 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code; all other requirements 2of this Section shall be enforced by the Department of Central 3Management Services.4    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 5any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 6with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 7Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 8Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 9whatever reason, is unauthorized. 10(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 11eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 12103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 137-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-870, 14eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 15103-951, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-27, eff. 161-1-26, 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, eff. 171-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, 18eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 10-1-25.) 19    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-1)20    Sec. 6.11. Required health benefits; Illinois Insurance 21Code requirements. The program of health benefits shall 22provide the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 23covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 24Section 356t of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of 25health benefits shall provide the coverage required under   SB3549- 5 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 2356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 3356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 4356z.17, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 5356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 6356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 7356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 8356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.76, and 356z.77, 356z.79, and 356z.80, 9356z.81, 356z.82, 356z.83, 356z.84, 356z.85, and 356z.88 of 10the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of health benefits 11must comply with Sections 155.22a, 155.37, 355b, 356z.19, 12370c, and 370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance 13Code. The program of health benefits shall provide the 14coverage required under Section 356m of the Illinois Insurance 15Code and, for the employees of the State Employee Group 16Insurance Program only, the coverage as also provided in 17Section 6.11B of this Act. The Department of Insurance shall 18enforce the requirements of this Section with respect to 19Sections 370c and 370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois 20Insurance Code; all other requirements of this Section shall 21be enforced by the Department of Central Management Services.22    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 23any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 24with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 25Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 26Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for   SB3549- 6 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1whatever reason, is unauthorized. 2(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 3eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 4103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 57-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-870, 6eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 7103-951, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 87-1-27; 104-27, eff. 1-1-26, 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 91-1-26; 104-73, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, 10eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 11revised 10-1-25.) 12    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by changing 13Section 5-1069.3 as follows: 14    (55 ILCS 5/5-1069.3)15    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-68, 104-73, 16104-289, 104-324, and 104-379)17    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county, 18including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 19of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 20coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 21benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 22health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 23under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 24356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9,   SB3549- 7 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 2356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 3356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 4356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 5356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.74, 6and 356z.77, 356z.79, 356z.81, and 356z.88 356z.80 of the 7Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall comply with 8Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, and 370c of the Illinois 9Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall enforce the 10requirements of this Section. The requirement that health 11benefits be covered as provided in this Section is an 12exclusive power and function of the State and is a denial and 13limitation under Article VII, Section 6, subsection (h) of the 14Illinois Constitution. A home rule county to which this 15Section applies must comply with every provision of this 16Section. 17    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 18any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 19with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 20Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 21Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 22whatever reason, is unauthorized. 23(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 24103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 258-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 26eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25;   SB3549- 8 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 26-9-25; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 310-1-25.) 4    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-68, 104-73, 5104-289, 104-324, and 104-379)6    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county, 7including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 8of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 9coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 10benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 11health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 12under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 13356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 14356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 15356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 16356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 17356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 18356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.74, 19and 356z.77, 356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 356z.83, 20356z.84, 356z.85, and 356z.88 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 21The coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 22356z.19, and 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 23Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this 24Section. The requirement that health benefits be covered as 25provided in this Section is an exclusive power and function of   SB3549- 9 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1the State and is a denial and limitation under Article VII, 2Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home 3rule county to which this Section applies must comply with 4every provision of this Section. 5    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 6any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 7with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 8Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 9Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 10whatever reason, is unauthorized. 11(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 12103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 138-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 14eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 15103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 166-9-25; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, eff. 171-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, 18eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 10-1-25.) 19    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 20changing Section 10-4-2.3 as follows: 21    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-2.3)22    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-68, 104-73, 23104-289, 104-324, and 104-379)24    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a   SB3549- 10 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 2self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 3coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 4coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 5covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 6Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g, 7356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 8356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 9356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 10356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 11356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 12356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 13356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.74, and 356z.77, 14356z.79, 356z.81, and 356z.88 356z.80 of the Illinois 15Insurance Code. The coverage shall comply with Sections 16155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, and 370c of the Illinois Insurance 17Code. The Department of Insurance shall enforce the 18requirements of this Section. The requirement that health 19benefits be covered as provided in this is an exclusive power 20and function of the State and is a denial and limitation under 21Article VII, Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois 22Constitution. A home rule municipality to which this Section 23applies must comply with every provision of this Section. 24    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 25any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 26with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure   SB3549- 11 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 2Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 3whatever reason, is unauthorized. 4(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 5103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 68-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 7eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 8103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 96-9-25; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 1010-2-25.) 11    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-68, 104-73, 12104-289, 104-324, and 104-379)13    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a 14municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 15self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 16coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 17coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 18covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 19Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g, 20356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 21356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 22356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 23356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 24356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 25356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64,   SB3549- 12 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.74, and 356z.77, 2356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 356z.83, 356z.84, 3356z.85, and 356z.88 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 4coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, 5and 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of 6Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this Section. The 7requirement that health benefits be covered as provided in 8this is an exclusive power and function of the State and is a 9denial and limitation under Article VII, Section 6, subsection 10(h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home rule municipality to 11which this Section applies must comply with every provision of 12this Section. 13    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 14any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 15with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 16Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 17Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 18whatever reason, is unauthorized. 19(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 20103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 218-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 22eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 23103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 246-9-25; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, eff. 251-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, 26eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 10-2-25.)   SB3549- 13 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1    Section 20. The School Code is amended by changing Section 210-22.3f as follows: 3    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.3f)4    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-27, 104-68, 5104-73, 104-289, 104-324, and 104-379)6    Sec. 10-22.3f. Required health benefits. Insurance 7protection and benefits for employees shall provide the 8post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 9policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and 10the coverage required under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 11356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 12356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 13356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 14356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 15356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 16356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 17356z.74, and 356z.77, 356z.79, 356z.81, and 356z.88 356z.80 of 18the Illinois Insurance Code. Insurance policies shall comply 19with Section 356z.19 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 20coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, and 370c of 21the Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall 22enforce the requirements of this Section. 23    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 24any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance   SB3549- 14 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 2Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 3Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 4whatever reason, is unauthorized. 5(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 6103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 78-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 8eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 9103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 106-9-25; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 1110-2-25.) 12    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-27, 104-68, 13104-73, 104-289, 104-324, and 104-379)14    Sec. 10-22.3f. Required health benefits. Insurance 15protection and benefits for employees shall provide the 16post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 17policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and 18the coverage required under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 19356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 20356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 21356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 22356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 23356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 24356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.70, 356z.71, 25356z.74, and 356z.77, 356z.79, and 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82,   SB3549- 15 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1356z.83, 356z.84, 356z.85, and 356z.88 of the Illinois 2Insurance Code. Insurance policies shall comply with Section 3356z.19 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 4comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, and 370c and Article 5XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code. The Department of 6Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this Section. 7    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 8any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 9with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 10Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 11Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 12whatever reason, is unauthorized. 13(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 14103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 158-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, 16eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 17103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 186-9-25; 104-27, eff. 1-1-26; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 191-1-26; 104-73, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, 20eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 21revised 10-2-25.) 22    Section 25. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 23adding Section 356z.88 as follows: 24    (215 ILCS 5/356z.88 new)  SB3549- 16 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1    Sec. 356z.88. Coronary calcium scan and scoring. 2    (a) As used in this Section, "coronary calcium scan and 3scoring" means the use of computed tomography equipment to 4produce pictures of the coronary arteries to locate blockages 5or narrowing.6    (b) An individual or group policy of accident and health 7insurance that is amended, delivered, issued, or renewed on or 8after January 1, 2028 shall cover a medically necessary 9coronary calcium scan and scoring every 36 months for 10individuals over the age of 40. 11    Section 30. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 12amended by changing Section 5-3 as follows: 13    (215 ILCS 125/5-3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2)14    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-808, 104-28, 15104-68, 104-73, 104-98, 104-289, 104-324, and 104-379)16    Sec. 5-3. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. 17    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 18the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 19141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 20152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 21155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g.5-1, 22356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.3a, 23356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 24356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 356z.18,   SB3549- 17 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 356z.25, 2356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 356z.33, 3356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 356z.40, 4356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 5356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 6356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 7356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.69, 8356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.76, 9356z.77, 356z.78, 356z.79, 356z.81, 356z.88, 356z.80, 364, 10364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 368a, 368b, 368c, 368d, 11368e, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 12409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of 13Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, 14XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance 15Code. Section 356z.81 365z.80 of the Illinois Insurance Code 16is not applicable to health care plans under contract with the 17Department of Healthcare and Family Services. 18    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 19for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 20Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 21are deemed to be "domestic companies":22        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 23    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;24        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 25    State; or26        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another   SB3549- 18 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 2    of this State, except a corporation subject to 3    substantially the same requirements in its state of 4    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 5    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.6    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 7acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 8pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,9        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 10    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 11    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 12    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 13    acquisition of control takes effect;14        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 15    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 16    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 17    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 18    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 19    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 20    other acquisition of control;21        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 22    following information:23            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 24        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 25        Organization sought to be acquired;26            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the   SB3549- 19 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 2        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 3        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 4        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 5        forma financial statements reflecting projected 6        combined operation for a period of 2 years;7            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 8        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 9        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 10        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and11            (D) such other information as the Director shall 12        require.13    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 14Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 15any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 16enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 17maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 18to its health care certificates).19    (e) In considering any management contract or service 20agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 21Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 22specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 23take into account the effect of the management contract or 24service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 25and the financial condition of the health maintenance 26organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take   SB3549- 20 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1into account the effect of the management contract or service 2agreement on competition.3    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 4Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 5Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 6defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 7Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 8group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 9additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:10        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 11    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 12    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 13    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 14    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 15    not be less than one year); and16        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 17    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 18    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 19    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 20    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 21    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 22    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 23    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 24    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 25    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 26    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and   SB3549- 21 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 2    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 3    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 4    plan years.5    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 6statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 7describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 8and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 9the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 10to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 11profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 12unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 13or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 14experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 15the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 16enrollment unit.17    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 18Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 19contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 20refund authorized under this Section.21    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 22if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 23accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 24Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 25Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 26adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized.   SB3549- 22 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 2103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-420, eff. 31-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, 4eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 5103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 61-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, 7eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 8103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 91-1-25; 104-1, eff. 6-9-25; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-334, eff. 108-15-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 10-3-25.) 11    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-808, 104-28, 12104-68, 104-73, 104-98, 104-289, 104-324, and 104-379)13    Sec. 5-3. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. 14    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 15the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 16141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 17152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 18155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355.7, 355b, 355c, 356f, 19356g, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 20356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 21356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 22356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 23356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 24356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 25356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46,   SB3549- 23 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 2356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 3356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 4356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 5356z.76, 356z.77, 356z.78, 356z.79, 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.82, 6356z.83, 356z.84, 356z.85, 356z.88, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 7367.2-5, 367i, 368a, 368b, 368c, 368d, 368e, 370a, 370c, 8370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, 9and 444.1, paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of Section 367, and 10Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, 11XXVI, and XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code.12    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 13for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 14Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 15are deemed to be "domestic companies":16        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 17    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;18        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 19    State; or20        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 21    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 22    of this State, except a corporation subject to 23    substantially the same requirements in its state of 24    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 25    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.26    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other   SB3549- 24 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 2pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,3        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 4    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 5    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 6    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 7    acquisition of control takes effect;8        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 9    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 10    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 11    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 12    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 13    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 14    other acquisition of control;15        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 16    following information:17            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 18        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 19        Organization sought to be acquired;20            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 21        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 22        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 23        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 24        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 25        forma financial statements reflecting projected 26        combined operation for a period of 2 years;  SB3549- 25 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 2        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 3        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 4        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and5            (D) such other information as the Director shall 6        require.7    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 8Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 9any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 10enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 11maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 12to its health care certificates).13    (e) In considering any management contract or service 14agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 15Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 16specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 17take into account the effect of the management contract or 18service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 19and the financial condition of the health maintenance 20organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 21into account the effect of the management contract or service 22agreement on competition.23    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 24Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 25Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 26defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a   SB3549- 26 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 2group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 3additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:4        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 5    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 6    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 7    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 8    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 9    not be less than one year); and10        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 11    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 12    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 13    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 14    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 15    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 16    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 17    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 18    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 19    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 20    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 21    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 22    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 23    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 24    plan years.25    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 26statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee   SB3549- 27 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 2and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 3the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 4to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 5profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 6unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 7or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 8experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 9the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 10enrollment unit.11    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 12Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 13contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 14refund authorized under this Section.15    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 16if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 17accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 18Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 19Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 20adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 21(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 22103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-420, eff. 231-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, 24eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 25103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 261-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753,   SB3549- 28 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 2103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 31-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 6-9-25; 104-28, 4eff. 1-1-26; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-68, eff. 1-1-26; 104-73, 5eff. 1-1-26; 104-98, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 6104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-334, eff. 8-15-25; 104-379, eff. 71-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 10-3-25.) 8    Section 35. The Limited Health Service Organization Act is 9amended by changing Section 4003 as follows: 10    (215 ILCS 130/4003)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1504-3)11    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-73, 104-98, 12104-289, 104-324, and 104-379)13    Sec. 4003. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. Limited 14health service organizations shall be subject to the 15provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 141.1, 16141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 152, 153, 17154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.37, 155.49, 352c, 18355.2, 355.3, 355b, 355d, 356m, 356q, 356v, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 19356z.10, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 20356z.33, 356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 21356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.61, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71, 22356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.79, 356z.81, 356z.88, 356z.80, 23364.3, 368a, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 24444, and 444.1 and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII,   SB3549- 29 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance 2Code. Nothing in this Section shall require a limited health 3care plan to cover any service that is not a limited health 4service. For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 5for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 6limited health service organizations in the following 7categories are deemed to be domestic companies:8        (1) a corporation under the laws of this State; or9        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of another 10    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 11    of this State, except a corporation subject to 12    substantially the same requirements in its state of 13    organization as is a domestic company under Article VIII 14    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.15(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 16103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, eff. 171-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, 18eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 19103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 201-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 6-9-25; 104-42, 21eff. 8-1-25; 104-334, eff. 8-15-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 22revised 10-3-25.) 23    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-73, 104-98, 24104-289, 104-324, and 104-379)25    Sec. 4003. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. Limited   SB3549- 30 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1health service organizations shall be subject to the 2provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 141.1, 3141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 152, 153, 4154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.37, 155.49, 352c, 5355.2, 355.3, 355b, 355d, 356m, 356q, 356v, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 6356z.10, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 7356z.33, 356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 8356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.61, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71, 9356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.79, 356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.83, 10356z.84, 356z.85, 356z.88, 364.3, 368a, 370a, 401, 401.1, 402, 11403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1 and Articles 12IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and 13XXXIIB of the Illinois Insurance Code. Nothing in this Section 14shall require a limited health care plan to cover any service 15that is not a limited health service. For purposes of the 16Illinois Insurance Code, except for Sections 444 and 444.1 and 17Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, limited health service 18organizations in the following categories are deemed to be 19domestic companies:20        (1) a corporation under the laws of this State; or21        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of another 22    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 23    of this State, except a corporation subject to 24    substantially the same requirements in its state of 25    organization as is a domestic company under Article VIII 26    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.  SB3549- 31 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 2103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, eff. 31-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, 4eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 5103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 61-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, eff. 6-9-25; 104-42, 7eff. 8-1-25; 104-73, eff. 1-1-26; 104-98, eff. 1-1-26; 8104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-334, eff. 98-15-25; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 1010-3-25.) 11    Section 40. The Voluntary Health Services Plans Act is 12amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 13    (215 ILCS 165/10)  (from Ch. 32, par. 604)14    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-28, 104-73, 15104-98, 104-289, 104-324, and 104-379)16    Sec. 10. Application of Insurance Code provisions. Health 17services plan corporations and all persons interested therein 18or dealing therewith shall be subject to the provisions of 19Articles IIA and XII 1/2 and Sections 3.1, 133, 136, 139, 140, 20143, 143.31, 143c, 149, 155.22a, 155.37, 354, 355.2, 355.3, 21355b, 355d, 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356r, 356t, 22356u, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356y, 356z.1, 356z.2, 23356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 24356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.18,   SB3549- 32 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1356z.19, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 2356z.32, 356z.32a, 356z.33, 356z.40, 356z.41, 356z.46, 3356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 4356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 356z.71, 5356z.72, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 356z.79, 356z.81, 356z.88, 6356z.80, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 368a, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 7403A, 408, 408.2, and 412, and paragraphs (7) and (15) of 8Section 367 of the Illinois Insurance Code.9    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 10any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 11with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 12Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 13Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 14whatever reason, is unauthorized. 15(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 16103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 178-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, 18eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 19103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 201-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, 21eff. 6-9-25; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 22revised 10-3-25.) 23    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-28, 104-73, 24104-98, 104-289, 104-324, and 104-379)25    Sec. 10. Application of Illinois Insurance Code   SB3549- 33 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1provisions. Health services plan corporations and all persons 2interested therein or dealing therewith shall be subject to 3the provisions of Articles IIA and XII 1/2 and Sections 3.1, 4133, 136, 139, 140, 143, 143.31, 143c, 149, 155.22a, 155.37, 5354, 355.2, 355.3, 355.7, 355b, 355d, 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 6356m, 356q, 356r, 356t, 356u, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356y, 7356z.1, 356z.2, 356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 8356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 9356z.15, 356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 10356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.32a, 356z.33, 356z.40, 11356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 12356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 13356z.68, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 356z.79, 14356z.80, 356z.81, 356z.83, 356z.84, 356z.85, 356z.88, 364.01, 15364.3, 367.2, 368a, 370a, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 16408.2, and 412, and paragraphs (7) and (15) of Section 367 of 17the Illinois Insurance Code.18    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 19any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 20with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 21Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 22Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 23whatever reason, is unauthorized. 24(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 25103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 268-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718,   SB3549- 34 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 2103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 31-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-1, 4eff. 6-9-25; 104-28, eff. 1-1-26; 104-42, eff. 8-1-25; 104-73, 5eff. 1-1-26; 104-98, eff. 1-1-26; 104-289, eff. 1-1-26; 6104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 78-15-25; revised 10-3-25.) 8    Section 45. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 9changing Section 5-16.8 as follows: 10    (305 ILCS 5/5-16.8)11    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-73, 104-324, 12and 104-379)13    Sec. 5-16.8. Required health benefits. The medical 14assistance program shall (i) provide the post-mastectomy care 15benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 16health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 17under Sections 356g.5, 356q, 356u, 356w, 356x, 356z.6, 18356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.46, 19356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.64, 20356z.67, 356z.71, and 356z.75, and 356z.88 of the Illinois 21Insurance Code, (ii) be subject to the provisions of Sections 22356z.19, 356z.44, 356z.49, 364.01, 370c, and 370c.1 of the 23Illinois Insurance Code, and (iii) be subject to the 24provisions of subsection (d-5) of Section 10 of the Network   SB3549- 35 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1Adequacy and Transparency Act.2    The Department, by rule, shall adopt a model similar to 3the requirements of Section 356z.39 of the Illinois Insurance 4Code. 5    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 6rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 7any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 8of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 9with Section 5-5e. 10    To ensure full access to the benefits set forth in this 11Section, on and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall 12ensure that provider and hospital reimbursement for 13post-mastectomy care benefits required under this Section are 14no lower than the Medicare reimbursement rate. 15(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 16103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-703, eff. 171-1-25; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-417, 18eff. 8-15-25.) 19    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-73, 104-324, 20and 104-379)21    Sec. 5-16.8. Required health benefits. The medical 22assistance program shall (i) provide the post-mastectomy care 23benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 24health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 25under Sections 356g.5, 356q, 356u, 356w, 356x, 356z.6,   SB3549- 36 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.46, 2356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.64, 3356z.67, 356z.71, and 356z.75, and 356z.80, 356z.84, 356z.85, 4and 356z.88 of the Illinois Insurance Code, (ii) be subject to 5the provisions of Sections 356z.19, 356z.44, 356z.49, 364.01, 6370c, and 370c.1 of the Illinois Insurance Code, and (iii) be 7subject to the provisions of subsection (d-5) of Section 10 of 8the Network Adequacy and Transparency Act.9    The Department, by rule, shall adopt a model similar to 10the requirements of Section 356z.39 of the Illinois Insurance 11Code. 12    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 13rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 14any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 15of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 16with Section 5-5e. 17    To ensure full access to the benefits set forth in this 18Section, on and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall 19ensure that provider and hospital reimbursement for 20post-mastectomy care benefits required under this Section are 21no lower than the Medicare reimbursement rate. 22(Source: P.A. 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 23103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-703, eff. 241-1-25; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 104-73, 25eff. 1-1-26; 104-324, eff. 1-1-26; 104-379, eff. 1-1-26; 26104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 10-3-25.)   SB3549- 37 -LRB104 16024 BAB 29282 b1    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 2changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 3that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 4represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 5not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 6made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 7Public Act. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 91, 2027.